District of Columbia statutes.
16-2343.02

Sanctions.

If any party refuses to submit to a test the party may be punished by contempt or by other sanctions that the court considers appropriate.

Sept. 26, 1984, D.C. Law 5-123, § 3, 31 DCR 4056
Section 28(c)(7) of D.C. Law 15-354 provided that the section designation of § 16-2343.2 of the District of Columbia Official Code is redesignated as § 16-2343.02.
1981 Ed., § 16-2343.2.